Vermont, session 2025-2026, H617.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1370 is added to read:
§ 1370. SEIZURE ACTION PLANS
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 2 of 8
(a) As used in this section, “seizure action plan” means a written,
individualized health plan designed to acknowledge and prepare for the health
care needs of a student diagnosed with a seizure disorder.
(b)(1) Beginning in the 2027–2028 school year, the board of each school
district and the governing body of each approved independent school shall
designate at least two school employees at each school who have met the
training requirements necessary to administer or assist with the self-
administration of:
(A) a seizure rescue medication or medication prescribed to treat
seizure disorder symptoms as approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration and any successor agency; and
(B) a manual dose of prescribed electrical stimulation using a vagus
nerve stimulator (VNS) magnet as approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration and any successor agency.
(2) For those assigned the duties under this subsection, the training
provided shall include instructions in administering seizure medications,
manual vagus nerve stimulation, recognizing the signs and symptoms of
seizures, and the appropriate steps to be taken to respond to such symptoms.
(3) The presence of a registered nurse employed full time by a school
district who assumes responsibility for the administration of seizure
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 3 of 8
medications and the administrative oversight of vagus nerve stimulation shall
fulfill the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection.
(4) Prior to the administration of a seizure rescue medication or
medication prescribed to treat seizure disorder symptoms in a public or
approved independent school, the student’s parent or guardian shall:
(A) provide the school with a written authorization to administer the
medication at school;
(B) provide a written statement from the student’s health care
practitioner, which shall contain the following information:
(i) the student’s name;
(ii) the name and purpose of the medication;
(iii) the prescribed dosage;
(iv) the route of administration;
(v) the frequency with which the medication may be administered;
and
(vi) the circumstances under which the medication may be
administered; and
(C) provide the prescribed medication to the school in its unopened,
sealed package with the label affixed by the dispensing pharmacy intact.
(5) Permission for the administration of any of the medications listed
under this subsection shall be effective for the school year in which it is
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 4 of 8
granted and shall be renewed each following school year upon fulfilling the
requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(c)(1) Every public and approved independent school shall provide training
every two years to principals, guidance counselors, teachers, and other relevant
school personnel with direct contact with and supervision of children,
including bus drivers and classroom aides, on the recognition of the signs and
symptoms of seizures and the appropriate steps for seizure first aid.
(2) Any training programs or guidelines adopted by the Agency of
Education for the training of school personnel in the health care needs of
students diagnosed with a seizure disorder shall be fully consistent with
training programs and guidelines developed by the Epilepsy Foundation of
America and any successor organization. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, for the purposes of the training provided pursuant to this
section, a school district shall be permitted to use any adequate and appropriate
training program or guidelines for the training of school personnel in the
seizure disorder care tasks covered under this section. The instruction shall be
approved by the Agency of Education in consultation with the Department of
Health, may be provided online or in person, and shall be provided by the
nonprofit entity free of charge.
(d)(1) The parent or guardian of each student diagnosed with a seizure
disorder shall collaborate with school personnel to create a seizure action plan.
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 5 of 8
The school shall keep all seizure action plans on file in the office of the school
nurse or school administrator.
(2) The seizure action plan shall be distributed to any school personnel
or volunteers responsible for the supervision or care of the applicable student.
(3) The parent and the school shall develop the seizure action plan in
accordance with policies and procedures developed by the school board or the
governing body of an approved independent school. At a minimum, the plan
shall include a written statement from the student’s health care provider with
the following information:
(A) the student’s name;
(B) any seizure medication prescribed to the student;
(C) the dosage and method of administering the seizure medication;
(D) the frequency of administration of the seizure medication; and
(E) the symptoms necessitating administration of the seizure
medication.
(e)(1) Every public and approved independent school shall provide an age-
appropriate seizure education program to all students on seizures and seizure
disorders. The seizure education program shall be consistent with guidelines
published by the Epilepsy Foundation of America and any successor
organization.
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 6 of 8
(2) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 for the development and implementation of the seizure education
program.
(f) A school district, school district employee, or agent acting in good faith
and in substantial compliance with the student’s individual health plan and the
instructions of the student’s licensed health care professional that provides
assistance or services under this section shall not be liable in any criminal
action for civil damages in the employee’s or agent’s individual, marital,
governmental, corporate, or other capacities as a result of the services provided
under this section to students with epilepsy or seizure disorders.
(g)(1) Beginning in the 2027–2028 school year and every school year
thereafter, each school district and the governing body of each approved
independent school shall annually certify compliance with the requirements of
this section.
(2) Compliance with this section shall include:
(A) completion of seizure training for required school personnel;
(B) implementation and maintenance of seizure action plans for
students diagnosed with seizure disorders;
(C) availability of designated and trained personnel to administer
seizure rescue medications; and
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 7 of 8
(D) distribution of the seizure action plan to relevant school
personnel and volunteers.
(3) The Agency shall develop and maintain an online database of all
public and approved independent schools indicating their compliance status
with this section. The database shall be publicly accessible on the Agency’s
website.
(4) Schools shall submit an annual compliance report to the Agency,
which in addition to certification of compliance with this section shall include:
(A) the number of staff trained in seizure recognition and first aid;
(B) confirmation of the implementation of seizure action plans for all
identified students; and
(C) any gaps or challenges in compliance, along with a corrective
action plan if necessary.
(5) The Agency shall conduct random audits or request additional
documentation from schools to ensure compliance with this section.
(h) Notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), on or before January 15 of each
year, the Agency shall submit an annual written report to the House
Committees on Education and on Health Care and the Senate Committees on
Education and on Health and Welfare summarizing rates of compliance with
this section, challenges in implementing and enforcing this section, and
VT LEG #386217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.617
2026 Page 8 of 8
recommended improvements to ensure the successful implementation of
seizure-safe school policies statewide.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386217 v.1